Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3606
Commitment; length of time.

Upon commitment, the person shall be confined until such time as the responsible attending physician determines that the patient no longer has communicable tuberculosis or that his discharge will not endanger public health.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 6, p. 1276.